Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-16] Statutes of limitations as
affected by period of service. The period of military service shall not be
included in computing any period for the bringing of any action or proceeding
in any court, or before a state or county agency by or against any person in
military service or by or against the person's heirs, personal representatives,
administrators, or assigns, whether the cause of action or right or privilege
to institute that action or proceeding accrued prior to or during the period of
the military person's service. No part of the period of military service that
occurs after July 1, 1994, shall be included in computing any period now or
hereafter provided by any law for the redemption of real property sold or
forfeited to enforce any obligation, tax, or assessment. [L 1994, c 257, pt of
§2]

Revision Note

"July 1, 1994," substituted for "the effective
date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next